Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.040

Certification cancellation.

(1) If the program participant obtains a legal change of identity, he or she loses certification as a program participant.

(2) The secretary of state may cancel a program participant's certification if there is a change in the residential address, unless the program participant provides the secretary of state with at least two days' prior notice in writing of the change of address.

(3) The secretary of state may cancel certification of a program participant if mail forwarded by the secretary to the program participant's address is returned as nondeliverable, refused, or unclaimed.

(4) The secretary of state shall cancel certification of a program participant who applies using false information.

[ 2008 c 18 s 3; 1991 c 23 s 4.]